Massachusetts, session 194th, S1101.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 34M of Chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “payable”, in line 82 the
following words:- whether in whole or in part,
SECTION 2. Section 34M of Chapter 90 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting after the word “fees”, in line 94, the following words:- except the court
shall not assess attorney’s fees or costs if, within thirty days of service of the summons and
complaint, the insurer tenders to the Plaintiff the amount due and payable.
of 1